test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: øld
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: øld
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: øld
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: aldar
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: øldir
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: øldum
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: alda
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: øldin
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: øldina
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: øldini
    øld+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: aldarinnar
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: øldirnar
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: øldunum
    øld+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: aldanna
